fi: Tuetut toistonopeudet: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Muu
zh-CN: 支持的播放速度: 16 2/3 转/分; 16 转/分; 33 1/3 转/分; 45 转/分; 78 转/分; 其他
th: ความเร็วการเล่นที่รองรับ: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; อื่นๆ
sv: Uppspelningshastighet som stöds: 16 2/3 rpm; 16 rpm; 33 1/3 rpm; 45 rpm; 78 rpm; Övrigt
nl: Ondersteunde afspeelsnelheid: 16 2/3 TPM; 16 TPM; 33 1/3 TPM; 45 TPM; 78 TPM; Andere
tr: Desteklenen oynatma hızı: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Diğer
sk-SK: Podporovaná rýchlosť prehrávania: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Iné
sl-SI: Podprte hitrosti predvajanja: 16 2/3 vrt./min; 16 vrt./min; 33 1/3 vrt./min; 45 vrt./min; 78 vrt./min; Drugo
ko: 지원 재생 속도: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; 기타
da: Understøttet afspilningshastighed: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Andet
ro-RO: Viteză de redare suportată: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Altele
pl: Obsługiwana prędkość odtwarzania: 16 2/3 obr./min; 16 obr./min; 33 1/3 obr./min; 45 obr./min; 78 obr./min; Inne
bg-BG: Поддържани скорости на възпроизвеждане: 16 2/3 оборота; 16 оборота; 33 1/3 оборота; 45 оборота; 78 оборота; Други
hr-HR: Podržana brzina reprodukcije: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Ostalo
zh-TW: 支援的播放速度: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; 其他
lt-LT: Palaikomas atkūrimo greitis: 16 2/3 aps./min.; 16 aps./min.; 33 1/3 aps./min.; 45 aps./min.; 78 aps./min.; Kita
pt-BR: Velocidade de reprodução suportada: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Outro
fr: Vitesse de lecture prise en charge: 16 2/3 TPM; 16 TPM; 33 1/3 TPM; 45 TPM; 78 TPM; Autre
ja: サポートされる再生速度: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; その他
pt-PT: Velocidade de reprodução suportada: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Outro
hu: Támogatott lejátszási sebesség: 16 2/3 ford./perc; 16 ford./perc; 33 1/3 ford./perc; 45 ford./perc; 78 ford./perc; Egyéb
en: Playback speed supported: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Other
de: Unterstützte Wiedergabegeschwindigkeit: 16 2/3 U/min; 16 U/min; 33 1/3 U/min; 45 U/min; 78 U/min; Sonstiges
cs: Podporovaná rychlost přehrávání: 16 2/3 ot./min; 16 ot./min; 33 1/3 ot./min; 45 ot./min; 78 ot./min; Jiné
ru: Поддерживаемая скорость воспроизведения: 16 2/3 об/мин; 16 об/мин; 33 1/3 об/мин; 45 об/мин; 78 об/мин; Другой
el: Υποστηριζόμενη ταχύτητα αναπαραγωγής: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Άλλο
it: Velocità di riproduzione supportata: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Altro
vi: Tốc độ phát lại được hỗ trợ: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Khác
nb: Avspillingshastighet støttet: 16 2/3 o/min; 16 o/min; 33 1/3 o/min; 45 o/min; 78 o/min; Annet
es: Velocidad de reproducción admitida: 16 2/3 RPM; 16 RPM; 33 1/3 RPM; 45 RPM; 78 RPM; Otros